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DTC PO 115/22 Mater Temperature Sensor Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The water temperature sensor senses the coolant temperature.
A thermistor built into the sensor changes the resistance value
(Fig.1) according to the coolant temperature. The lower the coolant
30 r temperature, the greater the thermistor resistance value, and
20 the higher the coolant temperature, the lower the thermistor re-
10 L Acceptable sistance value (See Fig.1).
5 The water temperature sensor is connected to the engine ECU
i 3 b (see next page). The 5 V power source voltage in the engine
S Lb ECU is applied to the water temperature sensor from the termi-
~§ L nal THW viaresistor R. That is, the resistor R and the water tem-
@ - perature sensor are connected in series. When the resistance
@ o5 value of the water temperature sensor changes, in accordance
03 with changes in the coolant temperature, the potential at the ter-
0.2 r minal THW also changes. Based on this signal, the engine ECU
01 L increases the fuel injection volume to improve driveability dur-
T S ! ing cold engine operation.
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
* Openorshortinwatertemp. sensor circuit
P0115/22 Openorshortin watertemp. sensor circuitfor 0.5 sec. ormore » Watertemp. sensor
*EngineECU
HINT:

When DTC P0115/22 is detected, check the engine coolant temperature by entering the following menus
on the intelligent tester II: Powertrain / Engine and ECT / Data List / Coolant Temp.

Temperature displayed Malfunction
-40°C (-40°F) Open circuit
140° C (284 ° F) ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-
neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.

. Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester Il. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the
malfunction occurred.

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester Il, and read value of water temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLC 3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester 1l main switch ON.
CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Same as actual water temperature.

HINT:

« If there is an open circuit, the intelligent tester Il indicates -40° C (-40°F).

. If there is a short circuit, the intelligent tester Il indicates 140° C (284° F) or more.

@

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI-4).

140°C (284 ° F) ormore... Goto step 4.

NG> -40°C (-40°F)...Gotostep 2.
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2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Water
Temp. Sensor

Ll C &

BE6653
F17055

Engine ECU

A00214

PREPARATION:

@

(@) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b) Connect sensor wire harness terminals together.
(c) Turntheignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.

OK:

Temperature value: 140°C (284 ° F) or more

OK>

Confirm good connection at sensor.
If OK, replace water temp. sensor.

3 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

Engine ECU

E2;Jr

Water Temp. Sensor

e
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THW E2

A23886

@

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the glove compartment door.

(b) Connectbetweenterminals THW and E2 ofthe engine
ECU connector.

HINT:

Watertemp. sensor connectoris disconnected.

Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the

engine ECU connector (see page IN-19).

(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester Il.

OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284 °F) or more

0K>

Open in harness between terminal E2 or THW,
repair or replace harness.

OK, replace engine ECU.

Confirm good connection at engine ECU. If
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Check for short in harness and engine ECU.

Water
Temp. Sensor

=

BE6653
F17054

En

gine ECU

A00216

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

0K> Replace water temp. sensor.

5 | Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

Water Temp. Sensor

Engine ECU
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E16 Connector

A23887

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.
HINT:
Water temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester Il
OK:
Temperature value: -40° C (-40°F)

OKé pair or replace harness or connector.

IN-19).

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
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When not using intelligent tester II:

1

Check voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

ey W

[OTTT M M T

oriy = [ 1 Measure the voltage between terminals THW and E2 of the en-

B
B

[Ennn
N 0rs

W W W gine ECU connector.

OK:
THW E2 Water temp. Voltage
Y A23883 20°C (68°F) (Engine is cool) 0.2t03.8V
80°C (176°F) (Engine is hot) 0.1to 1.5V

(See page DI-4).

OK> Check for intermittent problems

B

Check water temp. sensor (See Pub. No. RM617E on page ED-5).

NG> Replace water temp. sensor.

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
water temp. sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

3

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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